Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1609
Accreditation; effect.

Accreditation by accrediting agencies recognized by the United States Department of Education such as the Association of Independent Colleges and Schools, the Accrediting Council for Continuing Education and Training, the National Accrediting Association of Cosmetology Arts and Sciences, or the National Association of Trade and Technical Schools may be accepted by the department as evidence of compliance with the minimum standards established pursuant to sections 85-1606 and 85-1608. Accreditation by a recognized, specialized accrediting agency such as the Council on Medical Education of the American Medical Association, the Commission on Accreditation of the American Dental Association, or the American Veterinary Medical Association may be accepted as evidence of such compliance only as to the portion or program of a school accredited by such agency if the school as a whole is not accredited.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 10;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2810;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 9;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 54.